Tennessee, session 114, HB2402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-126, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) If a first responder from a local emergency management agency is killed in
the line of duty, the chief executive officer of the local government that employed the first
responder shall order all flags at public buildings in the jurisdiction to be flown at half-
mast for at least one (1) day.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2402
012777
- 1 -